Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.340

Fees—Disposition.

Except as provided in subsection (15) of this section, the following fees shall be paid in advance under the provisions of this chapter:

(1)(a) For registration of securities by qualification, the fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-twentieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars which are to be offered during that year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That an issuer may upon the payment of a fifty dollar fee renew for one additional twelve-month period only the unsold portion for which the registration fee has been paid.

(b) For the offer of a federal covered security that (i) is an exempt security pursuant to section 3(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and (ii) would not qualify for the exemption or a discretionary order of exemption pursuant to RCW 21.20.310(1), the fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-twentieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars which are to be offered during that year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That an issuer may upon the payment of a fifty dollar fee renew for one additional twelve-month period only the unsold portion for which the filing fee has been paid.

(2)(a) For registration by coordination of securities issued by an investment company, other than a closed-end company, as those terms are defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, the fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-twentieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars which are to be offered in this state during that year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That an issuer may upon the payment of a fifty dollar fee renew for one additional twelve-month period the unsold portion for which the registration fee has been paid.

(b) For each offering by an investment company, other than a closed-end company, as those terms are defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, making a notice filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.327(1), the initial filing fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-twentieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars which are to be offered in this state during that year. The amount offered in this state during the year may be increased by paying one-twentieth of one percent of the desired increase, based on offering price, prior to the sale of securities to be covered by the fee: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That an issuer may upon the payment of a fifty dollar fee renew for one additional twelve-month period the unsold portion for which the filing fee has been paid.

(3)(a) For registration by coordination of securities not covered by subsection (2) of this section, the initial filing fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-fortieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars for the first twelve-month period plus one hundred dollars for each additional twelve months in which the same offering is continued. The amount offered in this state during the year may be increased by paying one-fortieth of one percent of the desired increase, based on offering price, prior to the sale of securities to be covered by the fee.

(b) For each offering by a closed-end investment company, making a notice filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.327(1), the initial filing fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-fortieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars for the first twelve-month period plus one hundred dollars for each additional twelve months in which the same offering is continued. The amount offered in this state during the year may be increased by paying one-fortieth of one percent of the desired increase, based on offering price, prior to the sale of securities to be covered by the fee.

(4) For filing annual financial statements, the fee shall be twenty-five dollars.

(5)(a) For filing an amended offering circular after the initial registration permit has been granted or pursuant to RCW 21.20.327(1)(b), the fee shall be ten dollars.

(b) For filing a report under RCW 21.20.270(1) or 21.20.327(1)(c), the fee shall be ten dollars.

(6)(a) For registration of a broker-dealer or investment adviser, the fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars for original registration and seventy-five dollars for each annual renewal. When an application is denied or withdrawn the director shall retain one-half of the fee.

(b) For a federal covered adviser filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.050, the fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars for original notification and seventy-five dollars for each annual renewal. A fee shall not be assessed in connection with converting an investment adviser registration to a notice filing when the investment adviser becomes a federal covered adviser.

(7) For registration of a salesperson or investment adviser representative, the fee shall be forty dollars for original registration with each employer and twenty dollars for each annual renewal. When an application is denied or withdrawn the director shall retain one-half of the fee.

(8) If a registration, or filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.050, of a broker-dealer, salesperson, investment adviser, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser representative is not renewed on or before the renewal deadline specified in the central registration depository (CRD) or the investment adviser registration depository (IARD), as applicable, the renewal is delinquent. The director by rule or order may set and assess a fee for delinquency not to exceed two hundred dollars. Acceptance by the director of an application for renewal after the renewal deadline specified in the CRD or the IARD, as applicable, is not a waiver of delinquency. A delinquent application for renewal will not be accepted for filing after March 1st.

(9)(a) For the transfer of a broker-dealer license to a successor, the fee shall be fifty dollars.

(b) For the transfer of a salesperson license from a broker-dealer or issuer to another broker-dealer or issuer, the transfer fee shall be twenty-five dollars.

(c) For the transfer of an investment adviser representative license from an investment adviser to another investment adviser, the transfer fee shall be twenty-five dollars.

(d) For the transfer of an investment adviser license to a successor, the fee shall be fifty dollars.

(10)(a) The director may provide by rule for the filing of notice of claim of exemption under RCW 21.20.320 (1), (9), and (17) and set fees accordingly not to exceed three hundred dollars.

(b) For the filing required by RCW 21.20.327(2), the fee shall be three hundred dollars.

(11) For filing of notification of claim of exemption from registration pursuant to RCW 21.20.310(11), as now or hereafter amended, the fee shall be fifty dollars for each filing.

(12) For rendering interpretative opinions, the fee shall be thirty-five dollars.

(13) For certified copies of any documents filed with the director, the fee shall be the cost to the department of financial institutions.

(14) For a duplicate license the fee shall be five dollars.

(15) Upon a finding by the department of financial institutions that a fee increase is necessary to defray the costs of administering this chapter, the director may by rule adjust the fees specified in this section upward by no more than fifteen dollars.

All fees collected under this chapter shall be turned in to the state treasury and are not refundable, except as herein provided.

[ 2018 c 185 s 1; 2016 c 61 s 10; 1998 c 15 s 16; 1995 c 46 s 5; 1994 c 256 s 20; 1988 c 244 s 17; 1986 c 90 s 2; 1981 c 272 s 7; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 24. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 188 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 172 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 20; 1974 ex.s. c 77 s 8; 1965 c 17 s 4; 1961 c 37 s 9; 1959 c 282 s 34.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Severability—Effective date—Implementation—Application—1988 c 244: See notes following RCW 21.20.700.

Effective date—1986 c 90: See note following RCW 21.20.320.

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 77: See note following RCW 21.20.040.

Effective date—1965 c 17 s 4: "Section 4 of this amendatory act shall take effect July 1, 1965." [ 1965 c 17 s 6.]